Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.105

Amendments to comprehensive plan to be adopted, certified, and recorded or filed in accordance with RCW 35.63.100.

All amendments to a comprehensive plan shall be adopted, certified, and recorded or filed in the same manner as authorized in RCW 35.63.100 for an initial comprehensive plan.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 144 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 144: See note following RCW 36.900.030.

Validation—1967 ex.s. c 144: See note following RCW 35.63.100.